North Dakota, session 69, HB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 20 of section 4.1-25-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
20. "Pasteurized milk ordinance" means the 20192023 revision of the Grade "A" Pasteurized
Ordinance issued by the United States food and drug administration and by the United States
department of agriculture's public health service.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-25-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-25-30. Standards for grade A milk and milk products - Adoption of rules.
Only grade A milk may be sold as a fluid beverage for human consumption. The minimum
standards for milk and milk products designated as grade A are the same as the minimum requirements
of the pasteurized milk ordinance which includes provisions from the "Grade A Condensed and Dry Milk
Products and Condensed and Dry Whey - Supplement 1 to the Grade A PMO". The commissioner may
adopt rules imposing other standards in the interest of public safety, wholesomeness of product,
consumer interest, sanitation, good supply, saleability, and promotion of grade A milk and milk products.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-25-31 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-25-31. State milk sanitation rating and sampling surveillance officer - Duties - Guidelines.
The state milk sanitation rating and sampling surveillance officer is responsible for the rating and
certification of milk and dairy products. The rating and certification of milk and dairy products must be in
accordance with the procedures outlined in the public health service food and drug administration
publication entitled "Methods of Making Sanitation Ratings of Milk Shippers - 2019and the
Certifications/Listings of Single-Service Containers and/or Closures for Milk and/or Milk Products
Manufacturers 2023 Revision, Edition" and the sampling of milk and dairy products must be in
accordance with the guidelines in the Standard Methods.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-25-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-25-32. Milk laboratory evaluations officer - Duties - Guidelines.
The milk laboratory evaluations officer is responsible for the certification and evaluation of milk and
dairy products laboratories within the state. Evaluations and certification of milk laboratories must be
made in accordance with the Standard Methods and the procedures outlined in the public health
service food and drug administration publication entitled "Evaluation of Milk Laboratories - 20192023
Edition".

H. B. NO. 1083 - PAGE 2
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-25-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-25-33. Grade A pasteurized milk ordinance.
Dairy producers, processors, and manufacturers shall comply with the pasteurized milk ordinance
and follow the standards set by the "Procedures Governing the Cooperative State-Public Health Service
Food and Drug Administration Program of the National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments,
20192023 Revision".

H. B. NO. 1083 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1083.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State